Hawaii statutes.
[§425E-904] Issuance of certificate
of authority. (a) If the director finds that an application for
registration conforms to law and all requisite fees have been paid, the
director shall issue a certificate of authority to transact business in this
State.

(b) The certificate of authority shall be
returned to the person who filed the application or that person's
representative. [L 2003, c 210, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next